District of Columbia statutes.
29-102.07

Evidentiary effect of copy of filed record.

A certification from the Mayor accompanying a copy of a filed record shall be conclusive evidence that the copy is an accurate representation of the original record on file with the Mayor.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720